Maryland, session 2025, SB0529.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Occupations and Professions
14–305.
(a) In addition to the other qualifications for a license set forth in this subtitle, an
applicant shall qualify under this section by meeting the educational and experience
requirements set forth in subsection (b), (c), or (d) of this section.
(d) (1) An applicant qualifies under this section if the applicant:
(i) subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, has at least 12 years
of work experience in engineering that is satisfactory to the Board and that indicates to the
Board that the applicant may be competent to practice engineering; and
(ii) 1. has passed the examination IN THE FUNDAMENTALS OF
ENGINEERING GIVEN BY THE BOARD UNDER THIS SUBTITLE; AND
– 1 –

Ch. 338 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2. AFTER PASSING THE EXAMINATION IN THE
FUNDAMENTALS OF ENGINEERING, HAS PASSED THE EXAMINATION in the principles
and practice of engineering given by the Board under this subtitle.
(2) If an applicant has completed 1 or more years of a college or university
curriculum in engineering that the Board approves, it may allow, for each of those years, a
1–year credit towards the experience requirement of paragraph (1)(i) of this subsection.
(3) If an applicant has completed 1 or more years of a college or university
curriculum in engineering that has not been approved by the Board, the Board may allow,
for each of those years, a credit of up to 6 months towards the experience requirement under
paragraph (1)(i) of this subsection.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 2 –